Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-60-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Home Mortgage Act.”

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4401.

Cross-References. Housing development agency bonds and notes, mortgage revenue bonds, §13-23-121.

7-60-102. Legislative declaration — Local powers to raise and use funds — Use of state loan ceiling.

It is hereby found and declared that there continues to exist throughout the state a seriously inadequate supply of decent, safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations, primarily accommodations for persons and families of lower and moderate income. This condition is contrary to the public interest and threatens the health, safety, welfare, comfort and security of the people of the state and is inimical to the sound growth and the development of its communities. An adequate supply of housing of a variety of housing types serving persons and families of all income levels and properly planned and related to public transportation, public facilities, public utilities and sources of employment and service is essential to the orderly growth and prosperity of the state and the state's communities. Present patterns and methods of providing housing unduly limit the housing options for many persons in the state.

It is further found and declared that one (1) major cause of this condition has been recurrent, cyclical shortages of funds in private banking channels available for residential mortgages. Such shortages contribute to reductions in construction starts of new residential units. In addition, these cyclical shortages make the sale and purchase of existing residential units difficult in many parts of the state, especially by those persons of lower and moderate income. The ordinary operations of private enterprise have not in the past corrected these conditions.

It is further found and declared that the reduction in residential construction starts associated with such shortages causes a condition of substantial unemployment and underemployment in the construction industry that results in hardships to many individuals and families, wastes human resources, increases the public assistance burdens of the state, counties, and municipalities, impairs the security of family life, impedes the economic and physical development of counties, cities and communities and adversely affects the welfare and prosperity of all the people of the state. A stable supply of adequate funds for residential mortgages is required to spur new housing starts in an orderly and sustained manner and thereby to reduce the hazards of unemployment and underemployment in the construction industry. The unaided operations of private enterprise, especially during periods of cyclical shortages of capital, have not always been able to meet and cannot always meet the need for a stable supply of adequate funds for residential mortgage financing.

It is further found and declared that these conditions associated with such recurrent shortages of residential mortgage funds contribute to the persistence of slums and blight and to the deterioration of the quality of the environment and living conditions of a large number of persons residing in the state of Tennessee, have adversely affected the economy of the state as a whole and of the counties, cities and communities in the state, and are contrary to the declared policy of the state to promote a vigorous and growing economy, to prevent economic stagnation, to increase revenues to the state and to its counties, cities and other communities, and to achieve stable local economies.

Based upon the experience of the past, shortages of funds for residential mortgages in the private investment system can be expected to recur from time to time in varying degrees of severity with the adverse consequences described in subsections (a)-(d). To bring greater stability to the residential construction industry and related industries, and thus to assure a steady flow of production of new housing units, counties or metropolitan governments having a population of two hundred thousand (200,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be given the power to raise funds from private investors through issuance of bonds and notes to:

Make funds available for permanent mortgage financing of housing for lower and moderate income persons and families;

Purchase existing mortgages from lending institutions within the state and direct an amount equal to the proceeds from the liquidated mortgage investments into new mortgages on residential housing for lower and moderate income persons and families;

Enter into advance commitments with lending institutions to purchase mortgage loans for housing for lower and moderate income persons and families made to such persons and families;

Make loans to lending institutions that require that substantially all of the proceeds of the loans be used for the making of mortgages for housing for lower and moderate income persons and families;

Make “qualified home improvement loans” not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per dwelling unit to finance alterations, repairs and improvements on or in connection with the existing residence by the owner of the residence, but only if such items substantially protect or improve the basic livability or energy efficiency of the property; and

Make funds available for housing loans for veterans who qualify as persons and families of low and moderate income by including in each issue of bonds sold under this chapter a United States department of veterans' affairs guaranteed loan program.

The general assembly hereby finds that the interests of the citizens of the state and the purposes of this chapter shall be best served by, and it is hereby determined that the state ceiling, as defined in the federal law, applicable to the state for any calendar year pursuant to the federal law shall be allocated among the governmental units in the state in accordance with title 9, chapter 20.

The general assembly further finds that the authority and powers conferred under this chapter and the expenditure of public moneys pursuant to this chapter constitute a serving of a valid public purpose and that the enactment of the provisions set forth in this chapter is in the public interest and is hereby so declared to be such as a matter of express legislative determination.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4402; Acts 1981, ch. 504, §§ 1-4; 1984, ch. 799, § 2; 1984, ch. 800, §§ 2, 4; 1989, ch. 201, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Powers granted to counties, §7-60-201.

7-60-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bonds” or “notes” means the bonds and notes respectively authorized to be issued by counties under this chapter;

“County” means any county or any metropolitan form of government in this state having a population of two hundred thousand (200,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, that by resolution has made the findings and determinations required by § 7-60-202, and that shall exercise all powers granted and make all findings and determinations required under this chapter by means of resolution;

“Federal law” means the Mortgage Subsidy Bond Tax Act of 1980 (26 U.S.C. § 103);

“Home” means residential housing, including real property and improvements on real property, consisting of one (1) or more dwelling units, including, but not limited to, condominium units, owned by one (1) person or family of lower or moderate income that occupies or intends to occupy one (1) of such units; provided, that the total number of units financed by a single home mortgage may not exceed two (2);

“Home mortgage” means an interest-bearing loan to a person or family of lower or moderate income for the purpose of purchasing or improving a home, constituting a first lien on real property and evidenced by a promissory note and secured by a mortgage, deed of trust or other security instrument on such home, but does not include a loan primarily for the purpose of refinancing an existing loan; provided, that such mortgage, deed of trust or other security instrument shall be guaranteed or insured by the United States, or any agency, department or instrumentality of the United States, or by any private mortgage insurance or surety company approved by the county, to the extent that such loan exceeds eighty percent (80%) of the lesser of:

The appraised value of the home at the time of its making; or

The sales price of such home;

“Home mortgage” shall not be construed to encompass any loan made under the “qualified home improvement loan” provisions of this chapter;

“Housing for lower and moderate income persons and families” means modest housing that is decent, safe, sanitary and adequate for the needs of the size of the family within sales price limits that do not exceed the sales price limits established and published by the Tennessee housing development agency for each county or metropolitan government having a population of two hundred thousand (200,000) or more by the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Lending institution” means any bank, trust company, savings bank, national banking association, federal national mortgage association approved mortgage banker, savings and loan association, building and loan association, credit union, mortgage banker or other financial institution or governmental agency that customarily provides service or otherwise aids in the financing of mortgages on residential housing in the state or any holding company for any of the lending institutions and that is located in the state;

“Persons and families of low and moderate income” means persons and families, regardless of race, creed, national origin, age or sex, deemed to require such assistance as is made available by this chapter with the income limits established for each county by the governing body of such county, except that the income limits cannot exceed the income limits set by the Tennessee housing development agency for its programs. In establishing these income limits, the governing body of the county acting under this chapter shall be required to take into consideration, without limitation, such factors that will ensure for the citizens of such county the opportunity to live in equal quality housing relative to their needs, including the following:

The amount of the total income of such persons and families available for housing needs;

The size of the family;

The cost and condition of housing facilities available, including consideration of the following:

The cost of a typical dwelling lot;

The cost of materials;

The cost of labor;

The cost of real estate taxes; and

The cost of home owners' or renters' insurance;

The eligibility of such persons and families for federal housing assistance of any type predicated upon a lower income basis; and

The ability of such persons and families to compete successfully in the private housing market and to pay the amounts prevailing in such market for decent, safe and sanitary housing;

“Purposes of this chapter” means ameliorating the deterioration of counties by preserving and expanding employment opportunities in the construction and related industries and the tax base of counties by undertaking or assisting in the financing of home mortgages for persons and families of lower and moderate income;

“Qualified home improvement loan” means an interest-bearing loan to a person of lower or moderate income for the purpose of improving a home, constituting either a first or second lien on real property and evidenced by a promissory note. No such loan shall be made for the sole purpose of refinancing an existing loan. Such loans must be with respect to a single-family residence. Such loans may be made for home improvements, including, but not limited to, renovation of plumbing or electric systems, installations of improved heating or air conditioning systems, the addition of additional living space, and the renovation of the kitchen area. However, no such loan shall be applied to the addition of swimming pools, tennis courts, saunas, or other recreation or entertainment facilities. “Qualified home improvement loans,” to the extent practicable as determined by the underwriters of any bond issue, shall only be made in counties or metropolitan governments having a population of two hundred thousand (200,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

“State” means the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4403; Acts 1980, ch. 878, § 1; 1981, ch. 410, § 1; 1981, ch. 504, §§ 5-9; 1984, ch. 799, § 3; 1984, ch. 800, §§ 1, 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-60-104. Powers conferred as additional and supplemental — Limitations imposed — Effect.

The powers conferred by this chapter are in addition and supplemental to, and the limitations imposed by this chapter shall not affect, the powers conferred by any other general statute, special act, charter or ordinance of this state or any county. Home mortgages may be acquired, purchased and financed, and bonds or notes may be issued under this chapter for such purposes, notwithstanding that any other general statute, special act, charter or ordinance may provide for the acquisition, purchase and financing of like home mortgages or the issuance of bonds or notes for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other such law.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4420; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 10.

7-60-105. Construction — Grandfather clause.

This chapter is necessary for the health, welfare and safety of this state and its inhabitants; therefore, it shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Any proceedings of the governing body of any county under this chapter prior to June 12, 1981, are hereby validated, ratified, approved and confirmed, and may be continued as adopted or may be readopted or recommenced by such governing body.

Acts 1979, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4422; Acts 1981, ch. 504, § 32.